District of Columbia statutes.
6-731.01

Prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law except §§ 6-731.02 and 6-731.03, no person shall, during the period of time after the giving of a notice to vacate any rental unit (as defined by Chapter 35 of Title 42) and before the actual vacation of such unit, cause any alteration to the structure, plumbing apparatus, or electrical apparatus of the housing accommodation (as defined by Chapter 35 of Title 42) in which such unit is located, the result of which alteration is to cause such rental unit to come to be in substantial violation (or, if already in substantial violation, to be in greater violation) of the housing regulations of the District of Columbia for a period of time in excess of 24 hours; provided, that it shall not be a defense to an allegation of a violation of this section that the notice to vacate was invalid.

Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-129, § 2, 23 DCR 9693
This section is referenced in § 6-731.02, § 6-731.03, and § 6-731.04.
1981 Ed., § 5-525.
1973 Ed., § 5-324.
The references to “Chapter 35 of Title 42” originally read “Chapter 15 of Title 45” [1981 Ed.]; however, the provisions of former § 45-1551 [1981 Ed.] expired and have been superseded by the provisions of § 42-3504.01. See notes to §§ 42-4051 and 42-3504.01.